Idaho, session 2026, S1376.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 34-1404, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1404. DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY. (1) Candidates for election in any
political subdivision shall be nominated by nominating petitions, each of
which shall bear the name of the nominee, the office for which the nomination
is made, the term for which nomination is made, and the signature of not less
than five (5) electors of the candidate's specific zone or district of the
political subdivision and shall be filed with the county clerk of the politi-
cal subdivision.
(2) The clerk of each political subdivision shall provide to the county
clerk an accurate and detailed map of all subdistricts of the political sub-
division no later than January 1 of each year in which an election may be
held.
(2) (3) The form of the nominating petition shall be as provided by the
county clerk and shall be uniform for all political subdivisions.
(3) (4) The nomination petition shall be filed beginning at 8:00 a.m.
on the twelfth Monday before the election and no later than 5:00 p.m. on the
tenth Friday before such election. The county clerk shall notify the clerk
of the political subdivision shall notify the county clerk within twenty-
four (24) hours of receipt of the filing and verify the qualifications of the
nominees and shall, no more than seven (7) five (5) days after the close of
filing, certify the nominees to be placed on the ballot of the political sub-
division.
(5) Within forty-eight (48) hours of receipt of such notification, the
clerk of the political subdivision shall review and certify to the county
clerk the nominees to be placed on the ballot of the political subdivision.
(4) (6) Nominating petitions shall include campaign contact informa-
tion for candidates, including phone numbers and email addresses.
(5) (7) All information in nominating petitions shall be made publicly
available upon request.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.